California, session 20252026, SB1436.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6295 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:6295. (a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (h), when a motor vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, except for a recreational vehicle that is either truck-mounted, permanently towable on the highways without a permit or a park trailer, as these terms are used in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, is sold at retail by a dealer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, the dealer shall pay the applicable sales tax and any applicable use tax due under the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) to the Department of Motor Vehicles acting for and on behalf of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Sections 4456 and 4750.6 of the Vehicle Code.(2) The amendments to this subdivision made by Section 11 of Chapter 256 of the Statutes of 2021 do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.(b) If the dealer makes an application to the Department of Motor Vehicles that is not timely, and is subject to penalty because of delinquency in effecting registration or transfer of registration of the vehicle, the dealer shall also be liable for penalty as specified in Section 6591, but no interest shall accrue.(c) (1)  Application to the Department of Motor Vehicles by the dealer shall be deemed a return filed with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6451) of Chapter 5 with respect to amounts reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subdivision (a).(A) An application submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles that is deemed a filed return pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as filed on the date the application is submitted.(B) An application submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles that is deemed a filed return pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of this part.(2) The amendments made to this subdivision by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to sales reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles for reporting periods beginning on and after January 1, 2021.(d) (1) If the dealer fails to make an application to the Department of Motor Vehicles, fails to pay the amount of sales or use tax due, or fails to timely file a return with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under Section 6452, interest and penalties shall apply with respect to the unpaid amount as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451).(2) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.(e) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply:(1) “Dealer” shall not include a franchisee as defined in Section 331.1 of the Vehicle Code, a franchisee of a recreational vehicle franchise as defined in Section 331.3, a manufacturer or remanufacturer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, an automobile dismantler holding a license and certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, or a lessor-retailer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11600) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, and subject to the provisions of Section 11615.5 of the Vehicle Code.(2) “Newly licensed dealer” means a dealer who was originally licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles on or after January 1, 2019.(f) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, through the adoption of regulations, establish any additional requirements for the implementation of this section.(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), this section shall apply to sales of vehicles occurring on and after January 1, 2021.(2) Based upon operational needs to effectively enforce the collection of taxes pursuant to this section, the Department of Motor Vehicles may establish the following compliance schedule for this section:(A) Newly licensed dealers, dealers whose seller’s permit was reinstated within the last two years, and dealers with a previous finding of underreporting within the last two years shall comply beginning January 1, 2021.(B) Except as provided in paragraph (3), all other dealers shall comply by January 1, 2023.(3) Based upon operational needs to effectively enforce the collection of taxes pursuant to this section, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles, may delay the compliance schedule set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) to no later than January 1, 2026, for dealers that made more than 300 retail vehicle sales in the previous calendar year and are not subject to the compliance schedule set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).(h) (1) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles, may exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a) any dealer, including any dealer that has paid the applicable sales tax and any applicable use tax due to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subdivision (a) prior to the operative date of the act adding this subdivision, June 27, 2025, if the dealer sold 1,000 or more vehicles at retail in the current or preceding calendar year and the dealer’s account is in good standing with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.(2) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may revoke the exemption provided by this subdivision after at least 30 days following the date the department provides notice to the dealer that either of the following has occurred:(A) The dealer is no longer in good standing.(B) The dealer’s retail vehicle sales drop below 1,000 vehicles in any calendar year beginning on or after the operative date of the act adding this subdivision. June 27, 2025.(3) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may reinstate the exemption revoked pursuant to paragraph (2) if the department determines that the dealer has sold 1,000 or more vehicles at retail in the current or preceding calendar year and the dealer’s account is in good standing with the department. The department shall notify the dealer if an exemption is reinstated, and the exemption shall be effective on the first day of a calendar quarter commencing at least 30 days following the date of the notice. (3)(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “good standing” means that the dealer has timely filed and remitted applicable payments, including applicable prepayments, for all required sales and use tax returns for the most recent 12 quarterly reporting periods immediately preceding the issuance of the exemption. periods.SEC. 2. Section 17140.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17140.4. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, added by Section 102 of Division B of Public Law 113-295, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(a) Section 529A(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:(1) By substituting the phrase “under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001)” in lieu of the phrase “under this subtitle.”(2) By substituting “Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731)” in lieu of “Section 511.”(b) Section 529A(c)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “2.5 percent” in lieu of “10 percent.”(c) A copy of the report required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 529A(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reports, shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.(d) (1) The amendments made by Section 303(a) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(2) The amendments made by Section 303(b) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(3) and 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(3) The amendments made by Section 303(c) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(4) and 529A(c)(1)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE program, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(e) The amendments made by Section 11024(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(f) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 124 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023 (Public Law 117-328) to Section 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(2) (A) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, as it relates to the tax expenditures established by this subdivision and subdivision (f) of Section 23711.4 (hereafter the “tax expenditures,”) the Legislature finds and declares as follows:(i) The goal, purpose, and objective of the tax expenditures are to encourage and assist individuals and families to save private funds for purposes of supporting persons with disabilities to maintain their health, independent, and quality of life.(ii) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the tax expenditures are achieving their stated goal shall be the number of ABLE accounts that are created for individuals who are made newly eligible by the raised age limit.(B) No later than January 1, 2030, the Treasurer’s office shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of ABLE accounts that are created for individuals who are made newly eligible by the raised age limit.(g) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 70115(a)(1) of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law 119-21) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(2) The amendments made by Section 70115(a)(2) of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law 119-21) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply for contributions made on or after January 1, 2026, except as otherwise provided.SEC. 3. Section 23711.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:23711.4. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, added by Section 102 of Division B of Public Law 113-295, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(a) Section 529A(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:(1) By substituting the phrase “under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this part” in lieu of the phrase “under this subtitle.”(2) By substituting “Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731)” in lieu of “Section 511.”(b) Section 529A(c)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “2.5 percent” in lieu of “10 percent.”(c) A copy of the report required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 529A(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reports shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.(d) (1) The amendments made by Section 303(a) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(2) The amendments made by Section 303(b) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(3) and 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(3) The amendments made by Section 303(c) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(4) and 529A(c)(1)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(e) The amendments made by Section 11024(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(f) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 124 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023 (Public Law 117-328) to Section 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(2) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the goal, purpose, objective, performance indicators, and data collection requirements for the tax expenditure allowed by this subdivision shall be as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 17140.4.(g) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 70115(a)(1) of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law 119-21) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided. (2) The amendments made by Section 70115(a)(2) of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law 119-21) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply for contributions made on or after January 1, 2026, except as otherwise provided. SEC. 4. Section 4879 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4879. (a) Under the program, a person may make contributions for a taxable year, for the benefit of an individual who is an eligible individual for that taxable year, to an ABLE account that is established for the purpose of meeting the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary of the account if both of the following criteria are met:(1) The designated beneficiary is limited to one ABLE account for purposes of this chapter.(2) The ABLE account is established only for a designated beneficiary who is a resident of the United States.(b) A contribution shall not be accepted if either of the following occurs:(1) The contribution is not in cash.(2) Except in the case of contributions under Section 529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to change in designated beneficiaries or programs, the contribution to an ABLE account would result in aggregate contributions from all contributors to the ABLE account for the taxable year exceeding the amount of both of the following:(A) The amount allowed under Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exclusion from gifts, for the calendar year in which the taxable year begins.(B) In the case of any contribution by a designated beneficiary described in Section 529A(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code before January 1, 2026, Code, the lesser of either of the following:(i) Compensation, as defined by Section 219(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, includible in the designated beneficiary’s gross income for the taxable year.(ii) An amount equal to the poverty line for a one-person household as promulgated under Section 9902(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, for the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the taxable year begins.(c) The designated beneficiary shall retain ownership of all contributions made to the designated beneficiary’s ABLE account to the date of utilization for qualified disability expenses, and all interest derived from the investment of the contributions to the designated beneficiary’s ABLE account shall be deemed to be held in the ABLE program trust for the benefit of the designated beneficiary. Neither the contributions, nor any interest derived therefrom, may be pledged as collateral for any loan.(d) The board shall develop adequate safeguards to prevent aggregate contributions on behalf of a designated beneficiary in excess of the maximum contribution limits necessary to provide for the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary. For purposes of this subdivision, aggregate contributions include contributions under any prior qualified ABLE program of any state or agency or instrumentality thereof.